Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.220

False advertisement prohibited.

(1) A person may not disseminate false advertising with respect to food within the state, in any manner or by any means or through any medium.

(2) An advertisement of a food is false if it is false or misleading in any particular or if it is false or misleading within the meaning of 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321(n).

[ 2018 c 236 s 203.]